District of Columbia statutes.
46-354.02

Proceeding to determine parentage.

A tribunal of the District authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage of a child brought under this chapter or a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter.

History

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 402, 63 DCR 222